Washington statutes.
RCW 19.194.010

Recordkeeping by retail establishments—Contents—Inspection—Definitions.

(1) Any retail establishment doing business in this state that accepts for trade-in or exchange any computer hardware for the purchase of other computer hardware of greater value shall maintain, at the time of each transaction, a record of the following information:

(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;

(b) The date of the transaction;

(c) The name of the person or employee or the identification number of the person or employee conducting the transaction; and

(d) The name, date of birth, and address and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made.

(2) This record is open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions, and will be maintained for a period of one year following the date of the transaction.

(3) As used in this section:

(a) "Computer" means a programmable electronic machine that performs high-speed mathematical or logical operation or that assembles, stores, correlates, or otherwise processes information.

(b) "Computer hardware" means a computer and the associated physical equipment involved in the performance of data processing or communications functions. The term does not include computer software.

[ 1998 c 134 s 1.]